Massachusetts, session 194th, H554.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
Chapter 71 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2020 Official Edition is hereby 
amended by inserting the following:- 
“Each public school district shall develop and implement a comprehensive school 
counseling program that adheres to the Massachusetts Model for Comprehensive School 
Counseling Programs and ensures all pre-K to grade twelve (12) students will receive school 
counseling services from licensed school counselors. In accordance with the Model, each school 
counselor is to spend at least eighty percent (80%) of that school counselor’s time providing 
direct or indirect services to students. To maintain equity in student access to a school counselor, 
each district shall provide one (1) school counselor for a maximum of two hundred fifty (250) 
students, the nationally recommended average.”